Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1810
Civil action or proceeding; appeal; award of attorney's fees by appellate court, when.

A statute that authorizes the award of attorney's fees to a party in a civil action or proceeding also authorizes an appellate court to award attorney's fees if the party prevails on an appeal from a judgment or order in the action or proceeding. This section does not apply if another section of law specifically authorizes or prohibits the award of attorney's fees on an appeal from such a judgment or order.

Laws 2023, LB157, § 1.